Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-190
Wayne.

The county of Wayne is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-five, north, of range one, east; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-four, township twenty-five, north, of range five, east; thence north to the northeast corner of section three, township twenty-six, north, of range five, east; thence west to the northeast corner of township twenty-six, north, of range three, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-seven, north, of range three, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-seven, north, of range one, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 54, p. 222;

Laws 1889, c. 2, § 1, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 905;

C.S.1922, § 807;

C.S.1929, § 25-194;

R.S.1943, § 22-190.

Boundary of Wayne County was not affected by act of 1881, since boundaries could not be changed without vote of people. Wayne County v. Cobb, 35 Neb. 231, 52 N.W. 1102 (1892).